Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-624
Proceeding before department; service; decision; appeal.

(1) A copy of the order or decision of the department in any proceeding before it pursuant to the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act shall be served upon each party of record to the proceeding before the department. Service upon any attorney of record for any such party shall be deemed to be service upon such party. Each party appearing before the department shall enter his or her appearance and indicate to the department his or her address for the service of a copy of any order, decision, or notice. The mailing of any copy of any order or decision or of any notice in the proceeding, to such party at such address, shall be deemed to be service upon such party.

(2) Any decision of the department in any proceeding before it pursuant to the act may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 64.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.